Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,215
Project; land on which project is situated; sale; approval required; conditions.

(1) If approved by the director, an applicant may sell all or any part of the project authorized by the Nebraska Rural Projects Act or the land on which such project is situated to (a) a person who is seeking to establish a business at the site of such project, (b) a city, a county, or a public utility for the purpose of public works infrastructure, including, but not limited to, storm water management, or (c) an inland port authority for the purpose of developing, operating, or managing an inland port district located at the site of such project.

(2) The director shall approve a sale under this section if the director finds that:

(a) The sale furthers the goals of the project and the Nebraska Rural Projects Act; or

(b) If the sale is to an inland port authority, the sale furthers the goals of both the Nebraska Rural Projects Act and the Municipal Inland Port Authority Act.

(3) Any sale under this section shall not affect any matching funds already granted to the applicant and shall not disqualify the applicant from receiving matching funds after the sale.

Laws 2021, LB40, § 21;

Laws 2024, LB164, § 24.
April 17, 2024
Municipal Inland Port Authority Act, see section 13-3301.